Washington statutes.
RCW 9.66.040

Abatement of nuisance.

Any court or magistrate before whom there may be pending any proceeding for a violation of RCW 9.66.030, shall, in addition to any fine or other punishment which it may impose for such violation, order such nuisance abated, and all property unlawfully used in the maintenance thereof destroyed by the sheriff at the cost of the defendant: PROVIDED, That if the conviction was had in a district court, the district judge shall not issue the order and warrant of abatement, but on application therefor, shall transfer the cause to the superior court which shall proceed to try the issue of abatement in the same manner as if the action had been originally commenced therein.

[ 1987 c 202 s 140; 1957 c 45 s 4; 1909 c 249 s 251; Code 1881 ss 1244, 1245; 1875 p 80 ss 10, 11; RRS s 2503.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Jurisdiction to abate a nuisance: State Constitution Art. 4 s 6 (Amendment 28).